District of Columbia statutes.
3-904

Repealed

Meetings; quorums; committees; bylaws.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 5, 25 DCR 1391
Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-24, § 4, 26 DCR 405
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390
1981 Ed., § 2-1104.
1973 Ed., § 2-2504.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).

“Section 203 of the Crime Control Act,” referred to in subsection (c)(1), formerly codified in 42 U.S.C. § 3723, was superseded by Pub. L. 90-351, Title I, § 203, as added December 27, 1979, 93 Stat. 1174, Pub. L. 96-157, § 2.

“Section 223 of the Juvenile Justice Act,” referred to in subsection (c)(2), is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 5633.